Illinois, session 104th, HB5303.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Digital Assets and Consumer Protection Act 5is amended by changing Sections 1-5, 1-10, 15-10, 15-15, 620-25, 20-45, and 35-15 as follows: 7    (205 ILCS 731/1-5)8    Sec. 1-5. Definitions. 9    (a) As used in this Act: 10    "Affiliate" means any person that controls, is controlled 11by, or is under common control with another person. For 12purposes of this definition, "control" means the possession, 13direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the 14direction of the management and policies of a person. 15    "Applicant" means a person that applies for registration 16under this Act. 17    "Bank" means a bank, savings banks, savings and loan 18association, savings association, or industrial loan company 19chartered under the laws of this State or any other state or 20under the laws of the United States. 21    "Confidential supervisory information" means information 22or documents obtained by employees, agents, or representatives 23of the Department in the course of any examination,   HB5303- 2 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1investigation, audit, visit, registration, certification, 2review, licensing, or any other regulatory or supervisory 3activity pursuant to this Act, and any record prepared or 4obtained by the Department to the extent that the record 5summarizes or contains information derived from any report, 6document, or record described in this Act.7    "Conflict of interest" means an interest that might 8incline a covered person or an individual who is an associated 9person of a covered person to make a recommendation that is not 10disinterested. 11    "Corporate fiduciary" shall mean a corporate fiduciary as 12defined by Section 1-5.05 of the Corporate Fiduciary Act. 13    "Covered person" means a registrant or person required to 14register pursuant to this Act. 15    "Covered exchange" means a covered person that exchanges 16or holds itself out as being able to exchange a digital asset 17for a resident as part of a business or on behalf of a customer 18who has entered into an agreement with a business for the 19provision of such services. 20    "Credit union" means a credit union chartered under the 21laws of this State or any other state or under the laws of the 22United States. 23    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 24Professional Regulation. 25    "Digital asset" means a digital representation of value 26that is used as a medium of exchange, unit of account, or store   HB5303- 3 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1of value, and that is not fiat currency, whether or not 2denominated in fiat currency. "Digital asset" does not include 3any of the following: 4        (1) A digital representation of value that a merchant 5    grants as part of an affinity or rewards program and that 6    primarily relates to such affinity or rewards program.7        (2) A digital representation of value that is issued 8    by or on behalf of a game publisher and that is used 9    primarily within online games or gaming platforms.10        (3) Other digital representations of value that have 11    substantial value, utility, or significance beyond the 12    asset's mere existence as a digital asset, including 13    digital equivalents of tangible and intangible goods such 14    as: (A) works of art, musical compositions, literary 15    works, and similar intellectual property; (B) collectibles 16    and merchandise; and (C) licenses, tickets, and similar 17    rights to attend events or participate in activities.18        (4) A digital representation of value that is not 19    marketed, used, promoted, offered, or sold for investment 20    or speculation, except that this exclusion shall not apply 21    to any digital representation of value that (A) is 22    meme-based with no intrinsic value or utility or (B) is 23    marketed, used, promoted, offered, or sold in a manner 24    that intends to establish a reasonable expectation or 25    belief among the general public that the instrument will 26    retain a nominal value that is so stable as to render the   HB5303- 4 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1    nominal value effectively fixed. The Department may adopt 2    rules to clarify the scope and applicability of this 3    subsection.4        (5) A digital representation of value that is used as 5    part of prepaid cards.6    "Digital asset business activity" means any of the 7following: 8        (1) Exchanging, transferring, or storing a digital 9    asset as part of a business or on behalf of a customer who 10    has entered into an agreement with a business for the 11    provision of such services. 12        (2) Engaging in digital asset administration. 13        (3) Any other business activity involving digital 14    assets designated by rule by the Department as may be 15    necessary and appropriate for the protection of residents. 16    "Digital asset business activity" does not include (1) 17peer-to-peer exchanges or transfers of digital assets, (2) 18decentralized exchanges facilitating peer-to-peer exchanges or 19transfers solely through use of a computer program or a 20transaction protocol that is intended to automatically 21execute, control, or document events and actions, (3) the 22development, publication, constitution, administration, 23maintenance, and dissemination of software in and of itself, 24(4) the issuance of a non-fungible token in and of itself, and 25(5) validating a digital asset transaction, operating a node, 26or engaging in similar activity to participate in   HB5303- 5 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1facilitating, operating, or securing a blockchain system, and 2(6) any money transmission of legal tender occurring in, 3associated with, or related to the normal, typical, or 4customary performance of digital asset business activity. For 5purposes of this definition, "legal tender" means a medium of 6exchange or unit of value, including the coin or paper money of 7the United States, issued by the United States or by another 8government.9    "Exchange", when used as a verb, means to exchange, buy, 10sell, trade, or convert, on behalf of a resident, either of the 11following: 12        (1) A digital asset for fiat currency or one or more 13    forms of digital assets. 14        (2) Fiat currency for one or more forms of digital 15    assets. 16    "Exchange" does not include buying, selling, or trading 17digital assets for a person's own account in a principal 18capacity.19    "Executive officer" includes, without limitation, an 20individual who is a director, officer, manager, managing 21member, partner, or trustee, or other functionally equivalent 22responsible individual, of a person. 23    "Federally insured depository institution" shall mean an 24insured depository institution as defined by Section 3(c)(2) 25of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, 12 U.S.C. 1813(c)(2), as 26amended, or an insured credit union as defined by Section   HB5303- 6 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1101(7) of the Federal Credit Union Act, 12 U.S.C. 1752(7), as 2amended. 3    "Fiat currency" means a medium of exchange or unit of 4value issued by the United States or a foreign government and 5that is designated as legal tender in its country of issuance.6    "Insolvent" means any of the following: 7        (1) Having generally ceased to pay debts in the 8    ordinary course of business other than as a result of a 9    bona fide dispute. 10        (2) Being unable to pay debts as they become due. 11        (3) Being insolvent within the meaning of federal 12    bankruptcy law. 13    "Non-fungible token" means any unique digital identifier 14on any blockchain or digital asset network used to certify 15authenticity and ownership rights that is not readily 16exchangeable or replaceable with a mutually interchangeable 17digital asset of the same value. The Department may modify 18this definition by rule.19    "Person" includes, without limitation, any individual, 20corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, 21proprietorship, syndicate, limited liability company, 22association, joint venture, government, governmental 23subsection, agency or instrumentality, public corporation or 24joint stock company, or any other organization or legal or 25commercial entity. 26    "Prepaid card" means an electronic payment device that,   HB5303- 7 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1subject to any rules adopted by the Department:2        (1) is usable at a single merchant or an affiliated 3    group of merchants that share the same name, mark, or 4    logo, or is usable at multiple, unaffiliated merchants or 5    service providers;6        (2) is issued in and for a specified amount of fiat 7    currency;8        (3) can be reloaded in and for only fiat currency, if 9    at all;10        (4) is issued or reloaded on a prepaid basis for the 11    future purchase or delivery of goods or services;12        (5) is honored upon presentation;13        (6) can be redeemed in and for only fiat currency, if 14    at all;15        (7) is governed by the Uniform Money Transmission 16    Modernization Act; and17        (8) complies with any other condition designated by 18    rule by the Department as may be necessary and appropriate 19    for the protection of residents.20    "Qualified custodian" means a bank, credit union, or trust 21company, subject to any rules adopted by the Department. 22    "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible 23medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and 24is retrievable in perceivable form. 25    "Registrant" means a person registered under this Act. 26    "Resident" means any of the following:   HB5303- 8 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1        (1) A person who is domiciled in this State. 2        (2) A person who is physically located in this State 3    for more than 183 days of the previous 365 days. 4        (3) A person who has a place of business in this State. 5        (4) A legal representative of a person that is 6    domiciled in this State. 7    "Request for assistance" means all inquiries, complaints, 8account disputes, and requests for documentation a covered 9person receives from residents. 10    "Responsible individual" means an individual who has 11direct control over, or significant management, policy, or 12decision-making authority with respect to, a person's digital 13asset business activity in this State. 14    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 15Professional Regulation and any authorized representative of 16the Secretary. 17    "Service provider" means any person that provides a 18material service to a covered person in connection with the 19offering or provision by that covered person of a digital 20asset business activity in this State, including a person that 21either: 22        (1) Participates in designing, operating, or 23    maintaining the digital asset business activity. 24        (2) Processes transactions relating to the digital 25    asset business activity, other than unknowingly or 26    incidentally transmitting or processing financial data in   HB5303- 9 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1    a manner that the data is undifferentiated from other 2    types of data of the same form as the person transmits or 3    processes. 4    "State" means a state of the United States, the District 5of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or 6any territory or insular possession subject to the 7jurisdiction of the United States. 8    "Store,", "storage", and "storing", except in the phrase 9"store of value,", mean means to store, hold, or maintain 10custody or control of a digital asset on behalf of a resident 11by a person other than the resident. 12    "Transfer" means to transfer or transmit a digital asset 13on behalf of a resident, including by doing any of the 14following: 15        (1) Crediting the digital asset to the account or 16    storage of another person. 17        (2) Moving the digital asset from one account or 18    storage of a resident to another account or storage of the 19    same resident. 20        (3) Relinquishing custody or control of a digital 21    asset to another person. 22    "United States dollar equivalent of digital assets" means 23the equivalent value of a particular digital asset in United 24States dollars shown on a covered exchange regulated in the 25United States for a particular date or period specified in 26this Act, subject to any rules adopted by the Department.   HB5303- 10 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1    (b) Whenever the terms "include", "including" or terms of 2similar import appear in this Act, unless the context requires 3otherwise, such terms shall not be construed to imply the 4exclusion of any person, class, or thing not specifically 5included. 6    (c) A reference in this Act to any other law or statute of 7this State, or of any other jurisdiction, means such law or 8statute as amended to the effective date of this Act, and 9unless the context otherwise requires, as amended thereafter.10    (d) Any reference to this Act shall include any rules 11adopted in accordance with this Act.12(Source: P.A. 104-428, eff. 8-18-25; revised 12-12-25.) 13    (205 ILCS 731/1-10)14    Sec. 1-10. Applicability. 15    (a) This Act governs the digital asset business activity 16of a person doing business in this State or, wherever located, 17who engages in or holds itself out as engaging in the activity 18with or on behalf of a resident, to the extent not preempted by 19federal law and except as otherwise provided in subsection 20subsections (b), (c), (d), or (e).21    (b)(1) This Act does not apply to the exchange, transfer, 22or storage of a digital asset or to digital asset 23administration to the extent that:24            (A) the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. 25        78a et seq., or the Illinois Securities Law of 1953   HB5303- 11 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1        govern the activity as a security transaction and the 2        activity is regulated by the U.S. Securities and 3        Exchange Commission or the Illinois Secretary of 4        State; or5            (B) the Commodity Exchange Act, 7 U.S.C. 1 et 6        seq., governs the activity, the activity is in 7        connection with trading of a contract of sale of a 8        commodity for future delivery, an option on such a 9        contract or a swap, and the activity is regulated by 10        the U.S. Commodity Futures Trading Commission.11        (2) This subsection shall be construed in a manner 12    consistent with affording the greatest protection to 13    residents and the Department's authority under subsection 14    (a) of Section 1-15 to exercise nonexclusive oversight and 15    enforcement under any federal law applicable to digital 16    asset business activity. This subsection shall not be 17    construed to exempt an activity solely because a financial 18    regulatory agency has anti-fraud and anti-manipulation 19    enforcement authority over the activity.20    (c) This Act does not apply to the following persons: 21        (1) The United States, a state State, political 22    subdivision of a state State, agency, or instrumentality 23    of federal, state State, or local government, or a foreign 24    government or a subdivision, department, agency, or 25    instrumentality of a foreign government. 26        (2) A federally insured depository institution.   HB5303- 12 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1        (3) A corporate fiduciary acting as a fiduciary or 2    otherwise engaging in fiduciary activities. 3        (4) A merchant using digital assets solely for the 4    purchase or sale of goods or services, excluding the sale 5    or of purchase of digital assets, in the ordinary course 6    of its business. 7        (5) A person using digital assets solely for the 8    purchase or sale of goods or services for his or her own 9    personal, family, or household purposes. 10        (6) A person who (A) contributes connectivity software 11    or computing power or otherwise participates in the 12    process of securing a network, (B) records digital asset 13    transactions to the network or protocol governing transfer 14    of the digital representation of value, or (C) develops, 15    publishes, constitutes, administers, maintains, or 16    otherwise distributes software relating to the network, so 17    long as the person does not control transactions of 18    digital assets on the network.19        (7) A credit union with member share accounts insured 20    by an insurer approved by the credit union's primary 21    financial regulatory agency. An out-of-state credit union 22    may not conduct any activity in this State that is not 23    authorized for a credit union chartered under the laws of 24    this State.25        (8) A person whose digital financial asset business 26    activity with, or on behalf of, residents is reasonably   HB5303- 13 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1    expected to be valued, in the aggregate, on an annual 2    basis at $5,000,000 or less, measured by the United States 3    dollar equivalent of digital financial assets. 4    Nothing in this Act grants persons described in this 5subsection (c) authority to engage in any activity not 6otherwise granted under existing law.7    (d) The Department may by rule or order clarify whether an 8activity is governed under this Act or another Act that 9governs money transmission. This subsection (d) shall not be 10applied in a manner inconsistent with the protection of 11residents.12    (e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, the 13Department, by rule or order, may conditionally or 14unconditionally exempt any person, digital asset, or 15transaction, or any class or classes of persons, digital 16assets, or transactions, from any provision of this Act or of 17any rule thereunder, to the extent that the exemption is 18necessary or appropriate, in the public interest, and 19consistent with the protection of residents.20(Source: P.A. 104-428, eff. 8-18-25; revised 12-12-25.) 21    (205 ILCS 731/15-10)22    Sec. 15-10. Application. 23    (a) An application for a registration under this Act shall 24meet all of the following requirements: 25        (1) The application shall be in a form and medium   HB5303- 14 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1    prescribed by the Department. The Department may require 2    the filing of the application through a multistate 3    licensing system. 4        (2) The application shall provide all of the following 5    information relevant to the applicant's proposed digital 6    asset business activity: 7            (A) The legal name of the applicant, any current 8        or proposed business United States Postal Service 9        address of the applicant, and any fictitious or trade 10        name the applicant uses or plans to use in conducting 11        the applicant's digital asset business activity with 12        or on behalf of a resident. 13            (B) The legal name, any former or fictitious name, 14        and the residential and business United States Postal 15        Service address of any executive officer and 16        responsible individual of the applicant and any person 17        that has control of the applicant. 18            (C) A description of the current and former 19        business of the applicant and any affiliate of the 20        applicant for the 5 years before the application is 21        submitted, or, if the business has operated for less 22        than 5 years, for the time the business has operated, 23        including its products and services, associated 24        internet website addresses and social media pages, 25        principal place of business, projected user base, and 26        specific marketing targets.   HB5303- 15 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1            (D) A list of all of the following: 2                (i) Any digital asset, money service, or money 3            transmitter registration the applicant and any 4            affiliates hold in another state or from an agency 5            of the United States. 6                (ii) The date the registrations described in 7            subdivision (i) expire. 8                (iii) Any revocation, suspension, or other 9            disciplinary action taken against the applicant 10            and any affiliates in any state or by an agency of 11            the United States and any applications rejected by 12            any state or agency of the United States. 13            (E) A list of any criminal conviction, deferred 14        prosecution agreement, and pending criminal proceeding 15        in any jurisdiction against all of the following: 16                (i) The applicant. 17                (ii) Any executive officer of the applicant. 18                (iii) Any responsible individual of the 19            applicant. 20                (iv) Any person that has control over the 21            applicant. 22                (v) Any affiliate of the applicant. 23            (F) A list of any litigation, arbitration, or 24        administrative proceeding in any jurisdiction in which 25        the applicant or an executive officer, responsible 26        individual, or affiliate of the applicant has been a   HB5303- 16 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1        party for the 10 years before the application is 2        submitted determined to be material in accordance with 3        generally accepted accounting principles and, to the 4        extent the applicant or such other person would be 5        required to disclose the litigation, arbitration, or 6        administrative proceeding in the applicant's or such 7        other person's audited financial statements, reports 8        to equity owners, and similar statements or reports. 9            (G) A list of any bankruptcy or receivership 10        proceeding in any jurisdiction for the 10 years before 11        the application is submitted in which any of the 12        following was a debtor: 13                (i) The applicant. 14                (ii) An executive officer of the applicant. 15                (iii) A responsible individual of the 16            applicant. 17                (iv) A person that has control over the 18            applicant. 19                (v) An affiliate of the applicant. 20            (H) The name and United States Postal Service 21        address of any bank or credit union in which the 22        applicant and any affiliates plan to deposit funds 23        obtained by digital asset business activity. 24            (I) The source of funds and credit to be used by 25        the applicant and any affiliate to conduct digital 26        asset business activity with or on behalf of a   HB5303- 17 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1        resident. 2            (J) A current financial statement and other 3        documentation satisfactory to the Department 4        demonstrating that the applicant has the capital and 5        liquidity required by Section 20-5. 6            (K) The United States Postal Service address and 7        email address to which communications from the 8        Department can be sent. 9            (L) The name, United States Postal Service 10        address, and email address of the registered agent of 11        the applicant in this State. 12            (M) A copy of the certificate, or a detailed 13        summary acceptable to the Department, of coverage for 14        any liability, casualty, business interruption, or 15        cybersecurity insurance policy maintained by the 16        applicant for itself, an executive officer, a 17        responsible individual, an affiliate, or the 18        applicant's users. 19            (N) If applicable, the date on which and the state 20        in which the applicant is formed and a copy of a 21        current certificate of good standing issued by that 22        state. 23            (O) If a person has control of the applicant and 24        the person's equity interests are publicly traded in 25        the United States, a copy of the audited financial 26        statement of the person for the most recent fiscal   HB5303- 18 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1        year or most recent report of the person filed under 2        Section 13 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 3        U.S.C. 78m. 4            (P) If a person has control of the applicant and 5        the person's equity interests are publicly traded 6        outside the United States, a copy of the audited 7        financial statement of the person for the most recent 8        fiscal year of the person or a copy of the most recent 9        documentation similar to that required in subparagraph 10        (O) filed with the foreign regulator in the domicile 11        of the person. 12            (Q) If the applicant is a partnership or a 13        member-managed limited liability company, the names 14        and United States Postal Service addresses of any 15        general partner or member. 16            (R) If the applicant is required to register with 17        the Financial Crimes Enforcement Network of the United 18        States Department of the Treasury as a money service 19        business, evidence of the registration. 20            (S) A set of fingerprints for each executive 21        officer and responsible individual of the applicant. 22            (T) If available, for any executive officer and 23        responsible individual of the applicant, for the 10 24        years before the application is submitted, employment 25        history and history of any investigation of the 26        individual or legal proceeding to which the individual   HB5303- 19 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1        was a party. 2            (U) The plans through which the applicant will 3        meet its obligations under Article 10. 4            (V) Any other information the Department requires 5        by rule. 6        (3) The application shall be accompanied by a 7    nonrefundable fee of $5,000 or the amount determined by 8    the Department to cover the costs of application review, 9    whichever is greater.10    (b)(1) On receipt of a completed application, the 11Department shall investigate all of the following: 12        (A) The financial condition and responsibility of the 13    applicant and any affiliate of the applicant. 14        (B) The relevant financial and business experience, 15    character, and general fitness of the applicant and any 16    affiliate of the applicant. 17        (C) The competence, experience, character, and general 18    fitness of each executive officer and director, each 19    responsible individual, and any person that has control of 20    the applicant. 21    (2) On receipt of a completed application, the Department 22may investigate the business premises of an applicant or an 23affiliate of the applicant or require the submission of any 24other documents or information the Department deems relevant 25to the application. 26    (3) The investigation required by this subsection must   HB5303- 20 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1allow the Secretary to issue positive findings stating that 2the financial condition, financial responsibility, competence, 3experience, character, and general fitness of the applicant, 4each executive officer and director, each responsible 5individual, any person that has control of the applicant, and 6any affiliate of the applicant are such as to command the 7confidence of the community and to warrant belief that the 8business will be operated honestly, fairly, and efficiently 9within the purpose of this Act; if the Secretary does not so 10find, he or she shall not issue the registration, and he or she 11shall notify the applicant of the denial. 12    (c)(1) After completing the investigation required by 13subsection (b), the Department shall send the applicant notice 14of its decision to approve, conditionally approve, or deny the 15application. If the Department does not receive notice from 16the applicant that the applicant accepts conditions specified 17by the Department within 31 days following the Department's 18notice of the conditions, the application shall be deemed 19withdrawn. The Department shall approve, conditionally 20approve, or deny any license application within 120 days after 21receipt of a completed application. 22    (2) The Secretary may impose conditions on a registration 23if the Secretary determines that those conditions are 24necessary or appropriate. These conditions shall be imposed in 25writing and shall continue in effect for the period prescribed 26by the Secretary.   HB5303- 21 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1    (d) A registration issued pursuant to this Act shall take 2effect on the later of the following: 3        (1) The date the Department issues the registration. 4        (2) The date the registration provides the security 5    required by Section 20-5. 6    (e) In addition to the fee required by paragraph (3) of 7subsection (a), an applicant shall pay the costs of the 8Department's investigation under subsection (b). 9    (f) A registration issued pursuant to this Act shall 10remain in full force and effect until it expires without 11meeting the reporting requirements of this Act renewal, is 12surrendered by the registration, or revoked or suspended as 13hereinafter provided. 14    (g)(1) The Department may issue a conditional registration 15to an applicant who holds or maintains a registration to 16conduct virtual currency business activity in the State of New 17York pursuant to Part 200 of Title 23 of the New York Code of 18Rules and Regulations, or a charter as a New York State limited 19purpose trust company with approval to conduct virtual 20currency business under the New York Banking Law, if the 21registration or approval was issued no later than the 22effective date of this Act and the applicant pays all 23appropriate fees and complies with the requirements of this 24Act. 25    (2) A conditional registration issued pursuant to this 26subsection shall expire at the earliest of the following:   HB5303- 22 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1        (A) upon issuance of an unconditional registration; 2        (B) upon denial of a registration; 3        (C) upon revocation of a registration issued pursuant 4    to Part 200 of Title 23 of the New York Code of Rules and 5    Regulations or disapproval or revocation of a charter as a 6    New York State limited purpose trust company with approval 7    to conduct virtual currency business under the New York 8    Banking Law.9(Source: P.A. 104-428, eff. 8-18-25.) 10    (205 ILCS 731/15-15)11    Sec. 15-15. Annual report Renewal. 12    (a) Registrations shall be subject to reporting 13requirements renewal every year using a common reporting 14renewal period as established by the Department by rule. A 15registrant shall submit to the Department an annual report may 16apply for renewal of the registration by submitting a renewal 17application under subsection (b) and pay paying all applicable 18fees due to the Department. 19    (b) The report renewal application required by subsection 20(a) shall be submitted in a form and medium prescribed by the 21Department. The report application shall contain all of the 22following: 23        (1) Either a copy of the registrant's most recent 24    reviewed annual financial statement, if the gross revenue 25    generated by the registrant's digital asset business   HB5303- 23 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1    activity in this State was not more than $2,000,000 for 2    the fiscal year ending before the anniversary date of 3    issuance of its registration under this Act, or a copy of 4    the registrant's most recent audited annual financial 5    statement, if the registrant's digital asset business 6    activity in this State amounted to more than $2,000,000, 7    for the fiscal year ending before the anniversary date. 8        (2) If a person other than an individual has control 9    of the registrant, a copy of either of the following: 10            (A) The person's most recent reviewed annual 11        financial statement, if the person's gross revenue was 12        not more than $2,000,000 in the previous fiscal year 13        measured as of the anniversary date of issuance of its 14        registration under this Act. 15            (B) The person's most recent audited consolidated 16        annual financial statement, if the person's gross 17        revenue was more than $2,000,000 in the previous 18        fiscal year measured as of the anniversary date of 19        issuance of its registration under this Act. 20        (3) A description of any of the following: 21            (A) Any material change in the financial condition 22        of the registrant and any affiliate of the registrant. 23            (B) Any material litigation related to the 24        registrant's digital asset business activity and 25        involving the registrant or an executive officer, 26        responsible individual, or affiliate of the   HB5303- 24 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1        registrant. 2            (C) Any federal, state, or foreign investigation 3        involving the registrant or an executive officer, 4        responsible individual, or affiliate of the 5        registrant.6            (D)(i) Any data security breach or cybersecurity 7        event involving the registrant. 8            (ii) A description of a data security breach 9        pursuant to this subparagraph does not constitute 10        disclosure or notification of a security breach for 11        purposes of any other law. 12        (4) Information or records required by Section 20-25 13    that the registrant has not reported to the Department. 14        (5) The number of digital asset business activity 15    transactions with or on behalf of residents for the period 16    since the later of the date the registration was issued or 17    the date the last report renewal application was 18    submitted. 19        (6)(A) The amount of United States dollar equivalent 20    of digital assets in the custody or control of the 21    registrant at the end of the last month that ends not later 22    than 30 days before the date of the report renewal 23    application. 24        (B) The total number of residents for whom the 25    registrant had custody or control of United States dollar 26    equivalent of digital assets on that date.   HB5303- 25 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1        (7) Evidence that the registrant is in compliance with 2    Section 5-10. 3        (8) Evidence that the registrant is in compliance with 4    Section 20-5. 5        (9) A list of all locations where the registrant 6    engages in digital asset business activity. 7        (10) Any other information the Department requires by 8    rule. 9    (c) If a registrant does not timely comply with this 10Section, the Department may take enforcement actions provided 11under Section 20-50. Notice or hearing is not required for a 12suspension or revocation of a registration under this Act for 13failure to pay a reporting renewal fee, file a report renewal 14application, or otherwise comply with this Section. 15    (d) Suspension or revocation of a registration under this 16Section does not invalidate a transfer or exchange of digital 17assets for or on behalf of a resident made during the 18suspension or revocation and does not insulate the registrant 19from liability under this Act. 20    (e) For good cause, the Department, in its sole 21discretion, may extend a period under this Section. 22    (f) A registrant that does not comply with this Section 23shall cease digital asset business activities with or on 24behalf of a resident. A registrant ceasing an activity or 25activities regulated by this Act and desiring to no longer be 26registered shall so inform the Department in writing and, at   HB5303- 26 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1the same time, convey any registration issued and all other 2symbols or indicia of registration. The registrant shall 3include a plan for the withdrawal from regulated business, 4including a timetable for the disposition of the business, and 5comply with the surrender guidelines or requirements of the 6Department. 7(Source: P.A. 104-428, eff. 8-18-25.) 8    (205 ILCS 731/20-25)9    Sec. 20-25. Material business changes. 10    (a) A registrant shall file with the Department a report 11of the following, as may be applicable: 12        (1) A material change in information in the 13    application for a registration under this Act or the most 14    recent renewal report of the registrant under this Act. 15        (2) A material change in the registrant's business for 16    the conduct of its digital asset business activity with or 17    on behalf of a resident. 18        (3) A change of an affiliate, executive officer, 19    responsible individual, or person in control of the 20    registrant. 21    (b) A report required by this Section shall be filed not 22later than 15 days after the change described in subsection 23(a). 24(Source: P.A. 104-428, eff. 8-18-25.)   HB5303- 27 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1    (205 ILCS 731/20-45)2    Sec. 20-45. Additional investigation and examination 3authority. In addition to any authority allowed under this Act 4or other applicable law, the Secretary shall have the 5authority to conduct investigations and examinations as 6follows: 7        (1) For purposes of initial registration, reporting 8    renewal, suspension, conditioning, revocation or 9    termination, or general or specific inquiry or 10    investigation to determine compliance with this Act, the 11    Secretary shall have the authority to access, receive, and 12    use any books, accounts, records, files, documents, 13    information, or evidence, including, but not limited to, 14    the following: 15            (A) criminal, civil, and administrative history 16        information, including nonconviction data as specified 17        in the Criminal Code of 2012; 18            (B) personal history and experience information, 19        including independent credit reports obtained from a 20        consumer reporting agency described in Section 603(p) 21        of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act; and 22            (C) any other documents, information, or evidence 23        the Secretary deems relevant to the inquiry or 24        investigation, regardless of the location, possession, 25        control, or custody of the documents, information, or 26        evidence.   HB5303- 28 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1        (2) For the purposes of investigating violations or 2    complaints arising under this Act or for the purposes of 3    examination, the Secretary may review, investigate, or 4    examine any covered person, affiliate, service provider, 5    individual, or person subject to this Act as often as 6    necessary in order to carry out the purposes of this Act. 7    The Secretary may direct, subpoena, or order the 8    attendance of and examine under oath all persons whose 9    testimony may be required about the transactions or the 10    business or subject matter of any such examination or 11    investigation, and may direct, subpoena, or order the 12    person to produce books, accounts, records, files, and any 13    other documents the Secretary deems relevant to the 14    inquiry. 15        (3) Each covered person, affiliate, service provider, 16    individual, or person subject to this Act shall make 17    available to the Secretary upon request the books and 18    records relating to the operations of the registrant, 19    affiliate, individual, or person subject to this Act. The 20    Secretary shall have access to those books and records and 21    interview the officers, principals, employees, independent 22    contractors, agents, and customers of the covered person, 23    affiliate, service provider, individual, or person subject 24    to this Act concerning their business. 25        (4) Each covered person, affiliate, service provider, 26    individual, or person subject to this Act shall make or   HB5303- 29 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1    compile reports or prepare other information as directed 2    by the Secretary in order to carry out the purposes of this 3    Section, including, but not limited to: 4            (A) accounting compilations; 5            (B) information lists and data concerning 6        transactions in a format prescribed by the Secretary; 7        or 8            (C) other information deemed necessary to carry 9        out the purposes of this Section. 10        (5) In making any examination or investigation 11    authorized by this Act, the Secretary may control access 12    to any documents and records of the covered person or 13    person under examination or investigation. The Secretary 14    may take possession of the documents and records or place 15    a person in exclusive charge of the documents and records 16    in the place where they are usually kept. During the 17    period of control, no person shall remove or attempt to 18    remove any of the documents or records, except pursuant to 19    a court order or with the consent of the Secretary. Unless 20    the Secretary has reasonable grounds to believe the 21    documents or records of the covered person or person under 22    examination or investigation have been or are at risk of 23    being altered or destroyed for purposes of concealing a 24    violation of this Act, the covered person or owner of the 25    documents and records shall have access to the documents 26    or records as necessary to conduct its ordinary business   HB5303- 30 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1    affairs. 2        (6) In order to carry out the purposes of this 3    Section, the Secretary may: 4            (A) retain attorneys, accountants, or other 5        professionals and specialists as examiners, auditors, 6        or investigators to conduct or assist in the conduct 7        of examinations or investigations; 8            (B) enter into agreements or relationships with 9        other government officials, regulatory associations, 10        or self-regulatory organizations in order to improve 11        efficiencies and reduce regulatory burden by sharing 12        resources, standardized or uniform methods or 13        procedures, and documents, records, information, or 14        evidence obtained under this Section; 15            (C) use, hire, contract, or employ public or 16        privately available analytical systems, methods, or 17        software to examine or investigate the covered person, 18        affiliate, service provider, individual, or person 19        subject to this Act; 20            (D) accept and rely on examination or 21        investigation reports made by other government 22        officials, within or outside this State; or 23            (E) accept audit reports made by an independent 24        certified public accountant for the covered person, 25        affiliate, service provider, individual, or person 26        subject to this Act in the course of that part of the   HB5303- 31 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1        examination covering the same general subject matter 2        as the audit and may incorporate the audit report in 3        the report of the examination, report of 4        investigation, or other writing of the Secretary. 5        (7) The authority of this Section shall remain in 6    effect, whether such a covered person, affiliate, service 7    provider, individual, or person subject to this Act acts 8    or claims to act under any licensing or registration law 9    of this State or claims to act without the authority. 10        (8) No covered person, affiliate, service provider, 11    individual, or person subject to investigation or 12    examination under this Section may knowingly withhold, 13    abstract, remove, mutilate, destroy, or secrete any books, 14    records, computer records, or other information. 15(Source: P.A. 104-428, eff. 8-18-25.) 16    (205 ILCS 731/35-15)17    Sec. 35-15. Transition period.18    (a) A covered person engaging in digital asset business 19activity without a registration under this Act shall not be 20considered in violation of Section 15-5 or 5-25 until July 1, 212028 2027.22    (b) A covered person engaging in digital asset business 23activity shall not be considered in violation of Sections 5-5, 245-10, and 5-20 until January 1, 2028 2027.25    (c) A covered exchange shall not be considered in   HB5303- 32 -LRB104 19433 BAB 32881 b1violation of Section 5-15 until January 1, 2028 2027.2    (d) Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Department may 3adopt rules pursuant to this Act upon this Act becoming law 4with such rules not to take effect earlier than January 1, 2027 52026.".6(Source: P.A. 104-428, eff. 8-18-25; revised 12-12-25.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.